Utah statutes.
76-10-3118.   Interpretation of act.

The Legislature intends that the courts, in construing this act, will be guided by interpretations given by the federal courts to comparable federal antitrust statutes and by other state courts to comparable state antitrust statutes.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

